Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF120.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 626.8516, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Forms. The commissioner must prepare the necessary grant application forms and make the forms available on the agency's public website no later than December 31, deleted text begin 2023deleted text end new text begin 2026new text end . new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective retroactively from July 1, 2023. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 626.8516, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Intensive education and skills training program. No later than December 31, deleted text begin 2023deleted text end new text begin 2026new text end , the commissioner, in consultation with the executive director of the board and the institutions designated as education providers under subdivision 6, shall develop an intensive comprehensive law enforcement education and skills training curriculum that will provide eligible peace officer candidates with the law enforcement education and skills training needed to be licensed as a peace officer. The curriculum must be designed to be completed in eight months or less and shall be offered at the institutions designated under subdivision 6. The curriculum may overlap, coincide with, or draw upon existing law enforcement education and training programs at institutions designated as education providers under subdivision 6. The executive director of the board may designate existing law enforcement education and training programs that are designed to be completed in eight months or less as intensive comprehensive law enforcement education and skills training programs for the purposes of this section. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective retroactively from July 1, 2023. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 626.8516, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Education providers; sites. (a) No later than October 1, deleted text begin 2023deleted text end new text begin 2026new text end , the Board of Trustees of the Minnesota State Colleges and Universities shall designate at least two regionally diverse system campuses to provide the required intensive comprehensive law enforcement education and skills training to eligible peace officer candidates. (b) In addition to the campuses designated under paragraph (a), the commissioner may designate privatedeleted text begin , nonprofitdeleted text end postsecondary institutions to provide the required intensive comprehensive law enforcement education and skills training to eligible peace officer candidates. (c) Effective July 1, 2025, the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota may request that the commissioner designate one or more campuses to provide intensive comprehensive law enforcement education and skills training to eligible peace officer candidates. Upon such a request, the commissioner may designate at least one of the requested campuses. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective retroactively from July 1, 2023. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $5,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of public safety for the Office of Justice Programs to continue the intensive comprehensive peace officer education and training program under Minnesota Statutes, section 626.8516. This appropriation is available through June 30, 2029. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end